Utah statutes.
3-1-2.   Definitions.
As used in this act, unless the context or subject matter requires otherwise:
(1)  "Agricultural products" includes floricultural, horticultural,
viticultural, forestry, nut, seed, ground stock, dairy, livestock, poultry,
bee and any and all farm products.
(2)  "Articles" means the articles of incorporation.
(3)  "Association" means a corporation organized under this act, or a similar
domestic corporation, or a foreign association or corporation if authorized to
do business in this state, organized under any general or special act as a
cooperative association for the mutual benefit of its members, as agricultural
producers, and which confines its operation to purposes authorized by this act
and restricts the return on the stock or membership capital and the amount of
its business with nonmembers to the limits placed thereon by this act for
associations organized hereunder.
(4)  "Board" means the board of directors.
(5)  "Domestic associations" means an association or corporation formed under
the laws of this state.
(6)  "Foreign association" means an association or corporation not formed
under the laws of this state.
(7)  "Member" includes the holder of a membership of which there shall be but
one class, in an association without stock and the holder of common stock in
an association organized with stock.
(8)  "Person" includes an individual, a partnership, a corporation and an
association.
(9)  "Producer" means a person who produces agricultural products, or an
association of such persons.
(10) (a)  "This act" means the "Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association
Act."
(b)  Associations shall be classified as and deemed to be nonprofit
corporations, inasmuch as their primary object is not to pay dividends on
invested capital, but to render service and provide means and facilities by or
through which the producers of agricultural products may receive a reasonable
and fair return for their products.
